src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
bad+N:bad N_MSC_with_PL_RED2 "father|dad" ;
biac+N:bayac N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "meat" ;
biac+N:biác N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-SL "meat" ;
bibədaʔ+N:bibədaʔ N_DIM_with_PL_12123 "doll" ;
bubx̌əd+N:bubx̌əd N_MSC_with_PL_RED2 "horsetail" ;
buusil+v2+N:buusi N_with_PL_RED2_0/l_Dial/-NL "Thursday" ;
buusil+v1+N:buusil N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-SL "Thursday" ;
č̓ač̓as+v2+N:č̓ač̓aš N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "child" ;
č̓ač̓as+v1+N:č̓ač̓as N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-SL "child" ;
čaləs+v1+N:čaləs N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-SL "hand" ;
čaləš+v2+N:čaləš N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "hand" ;
č̓awəyulč+N:č̓awəyulč N_with_PL_RED2 "bowl" ;
čəgʷas+N:čəgʷəš N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "wife" ;
cəlacil+v2+N:cəlaci N_with_PL_RED2_0/l_Dial/-NL "Friday" ;
cəlacil+v1+N:cəlacil N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-SL "Friday" ;
č̓itabac+v2+N:č̓itabəc N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "Saturday" ;
č̓ƛ̕aʔ+v2+N:č̓ə́ƛ̕əʔ N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "rock" ;
č̓ƛ̕aʔ+v1+N:č̓ƛ̕áʔ N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-SL "rock" ;
cqapsəb+N:qapsəb N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/c "neck" ;!word-init 2019-03-05
č̓t̕ilqʷəbš+N:č̓t̕ilqʷəbš N_with_PL_RED2 "(tribe members, what is plural?)" ;
dəxʷp̓aʔ+N:p̓aʔ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dexw "taste" ;
dəxʷtulalikʷ+N:tulalikʷ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dexw "book" ;
dxʷdaʔəb+N:daʔəb N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxw "medicine man" ;
dxʷduʔabš+N:duʔabš N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxw "(tribe members, what is plural?)" ;
dxʷləbiʔ+N:ləbiʔ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxw "(tribe members, what is plural?)" ;
dxʷləšucidəladxʷ+N:ləšucidəladxʷ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxw "calendar" ;
dxʷshədalqʷuʔ+N:hədalqʷuʔ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws "tea" ;
dxʷšiʔšɬbəd+N:šiʔšɬbəd N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxw "window|mirror" ;
dxʷskʷaxʷad+N:kʷaxʷad N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws "counselor" ;
dxʷsɬač̓alikʷ+N:ɬač̓alikʷ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws "firefighter" ;
dxʷsƛ̕alb+N:ƛ̕alb N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws "(tribe members, what is plural?)" ;
dxʷsqiq̓alikʷ+N:qiq̓alikʷ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws "police officer" ;
dxʷstəlawiltxʷ+N:təlawiltxʷ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws "bus driver" ;
dxʷstsulčalikʷ+N:tsulčalikʷ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws "drummer" ;
dxʷsx̌ʷiw̓xʷiw̓əd+N:x̌ʷiw̓xʷiw̓əd N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws "flutist" ;
dxʷsʔugʷusalikʷ+N:ʔugʷusalikʷ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws "teacher" ;
dxʷʔaha+N:ʔaha N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxw "(tribe members, what is plural?)" ;
gʷədᶻadad+N:gʷədᶻadad N_with_PL_RED2 "teachings" ;
ǰəsəd+N:šəd N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/je_Dial/-NL "foot" ;
kayə+v1+N:kayə N_FEM_with_PL_RED2 "grandmother" ;
kayə+v2+N:kayəʔ N_FEM_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
kayə+v3+N:kayaʔ N_FEM_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
k̓aʔk̓aʔ+N:k̓aʔk̓aʔ N_with_PL_RED2 "crow" ;
k̓ʷat̕ad+N:k̓ʷat̕ad N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-SL "mouse" ;!sk̓ʷat̕ad?
k̓ʷat̕ad+N:k̓ʷat̕ad N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-NL "mouse" ;!sk̓ʷat̕ad?
k̓ʷəčədiʔ+v1+N:k̓ʷəčədiʔ N_MSC_with_PL_RED2 "rabbit" ;
k̓ʷəčədiʔ+v2+N:k̓ʷəčəldiʔ N_MSC_with_PL_RED2 "rabbit" ;
ləsisu+N:sisu N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/le "scissors" ;
luƛ̕+N:luƛ̕ N_with_PL_RED2 "elder" ;
ƛ̕xʷayʔ+N:ƛ̕xʷáyʔ N_with_PL_RED130 "dog salmon|chum salmon" ;
pədkʷəxʷic+N:pədkʷəxʷic N_with_PL_RED2 "September" ;
pədx̌aʔx̌aʔ+N:pədx̌ax̌aʔ N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "Sunday" ;
pus+N:pus N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
qəlb+N:qəlb N_with_PL_RED1_qelb "rain shower" ;
qʷagʷəbalqʷuʔ+N:qʷagʷəbalqʷuʔ N_with_PL_RED2 "pop|juice|sweet drink" ;
sc̓abt+N:c̓abt N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "red elderberry" ;
scapaʔ+N:capaʔ N_MSC_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "grandfather" ;
sčatqɬəb+N:čatqɬəb N_MSC_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "" ;
scəbdatil+N:cəbdati N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-NL "Tuesday" ;
sčətxʷəd+N:čətxʷəd N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "bear|black bear" ;
səxʷc̓aʔkʷ+N:c̓aʔkʷ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "sink" ;
səxʷč̓əɬab+N:č̓əɬab N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "television|video" ;
səxʷgʷigʷədil+N:gʷigʷədil N_DIM_with_PL_12123_PRF/sexw "toilet" ;
səxʷkʷatač+N:kʷatač N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "ladder" ;
səxʷƛ̕əladiʔalikʷ+N:ƛ̕əladiʔalikʷ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "CD player" ;
səxʷp̓aʔad+N:p̓aʔad N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "what you taste with" ;
səxʷq̓ʷuʔgʷəsəd+N:q̓ʷuʔgʷəsəd N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "blender" ;
səxʷšic̓əlwaʔs+N:šic̓əlwaʔs N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "December" ;
səxʷʔayilalikʷali+N:ʔayilalikʷali N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "website" ;
sgʷigʷədiltəd+N:gʷigʷədiltəd N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "toilet seat" ;
sɬadəyʔ+v1+N:ɬadəyʔ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-NL "woman" ;
sɬadəyʔ+v2+N:ɬadayʔ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-SL "woman" ;
sɬaɬədəyʔ+v1+N:ɬaɬədəyʔ N_DIM_with_PL_12123 "girl" ;!Correct contlex!
sɬax̌il+N:ɬax̌i N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-NL "evening; night" ;
sɬax̌il+N:ɬax̌il N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-SL "evening; night" ;
sɬič̓aʔkʷčup+N:ɬič̓aʔkʷčup N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "hand saw" ;
sɬixʷəɬdatil+N:ɬixʷəɬdati N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-NL "Wednesday" ;
sɬixʷəɬdatil+N:ɬixʷəɬdatil N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-SL "Wednesday" ;
sq̓əbayʔ+v1+N:q̓əbáyʔ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-SL "skunk" ;
sq̓əbayʔ+v2+N:q̓əbiyəʔ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-NL "skunk" ;
sq̓əbayʔ+v3+N:q̓əbiyuʔ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "skunk" ;
sqʷəbayʔ+N:qʷəbáyʔ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-SL "dog" ;
sqʷəbayʔ+N:qʷubáyʔ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-NL "dog" ;
ssqʷaliqabš+N:sqʷaliqabš N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "(tribe members, what is plural?)" ;
swatixʷtəd+v1+N:watixʷtəd N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "land, earth, world, country" ;
swəwaʔ+v1+N:wəwaʔ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-NL "cougar" ;
swəwaʔ+v2+N:wawaʔ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-SL "cougar" ;
sx̌əy̓us+N:x̌əy̓ús N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-SL "head" ;
sxʷiuk̓ʷ+N:xʷiuk̓ʷ N_DIM_with_PL_12123 "basket ogress" ;
sxʷq̓ʷupabš+N:q̓ʷupabš N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sxw "(tribe members, what is plural?)" ;
syaʔyaʔ+N:yáyaʔ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-NL "friend, relative" ;
syaʔyaʔ+N:yáʔyaʔ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-SL "friend, relative" ;
syəcəb+N:yəcəb N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "information" ;
sʔuladxʷ:ʔuladxʷ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-SL "salmon" ;
təkʷtəkʷəlus+N:təkʷtəkʷəlus N_with_PL_RED2 "great horned owl" ;
x̌ibx̌ib+N:x̌ibx̌ib N_with_PL_RED2 "bird of prey" ;
x̌qp̓ucid+N:qp̓ucid N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/xh "knee" ;
yəx̌ʷəlaʔ+v1+N:yəx̌ʷəlaʔ N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-SL "eagle" ;
yəx̌ʷəlaʔ+v2+N:yəx̌ʷulaʔ N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "eagle" ;
yiyəq̓ʷ+N:yiyəq̓ʷ N_DIM_with_PL_12123 "pocket knife" ;
ʔaciɬtalbixʷ+N:ʔaciɬtalbixʷ N_with_Distr_12323_RED5 "" ;
ʔaciɬtalbixʷ+N:ʔaciɬtalbixʷ N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-SL "" ;
